Utah statutes.
4-16-3.   Department authorized to make and enforce rules -- Cooperation
with state and federal agencies authorized.
The department is authorized, subject to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, to make and enforce such rules as in its
judgment are deemed necessary to administer and enforce this chapter; and, in
conjunction with its administration and enforcement, it is authorized to
cooperate with other state agencies, other states, and with the United States
Department of Agriculture or other departments or agencies of the federal
government.
